Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1686YC (2) 91 da/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 9.15, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 9.15 Expedited filing service ââ surcharge. 3 1. Upon the request of the filer of a document, the 4 secretary shall provide an expedited filing service. As part 5 of the service, the secretary shall file a document submitted 6 by a filer on an expedited basis. 7 2. The secretary shall implement, assess, and collect a 8 surcharge for providing the expedited filing service based on 9 the period of service as follows: 10 a. For a one-hour service, the surcharge shall be two 11 hundred fifty dollars. 12 b. For a same-day service, the surcharge shall be one 13 hundred seventy-five dollars. 14 c. For a two-day service, the surcharge shall be fifty 15 dollars. 16 b. d. For a five-day service, the surcharge shall be 17 fifteen dollars. 18 3. The surcharge shall be added to the amount of the fee 19 implemented, assessed, and collected for the actual filing of 20 the document. 21 4. At the time of the expedited filing, the secretary shall 22 provide written confirmation of the filing. 23 4. 5. Any moneys collected by the secretary under this 24 section shall be deposited in the business administration fund 25 created in section 9.13 . 26